Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4539.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.666, is amended to read: 609.666 deleted text begin NEGLIGENTdeleted text end new text begin SAFE AND SECUREnew text end STORAGE OF FIREARMS. Subdivision 1. Definitions. new text begin (a) new text end For purposes of this section, the following words have the meanings given. deleted text begin (a)deleted text end new text begin (b)new text end "Firearm" means a device designed to be used as a weapon, from which is expelled a projectile by the force of any explosion or force of combustion.new text begin The term does not include firearms that are inoperable.new text end deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (c) "Authorized user" means a person who is eligible under state and federal law to possess a firearm and to whom the owner of a firearm has expressly granted permission to use the firearm.new text end new text begin (d) new text end "Child" means a person under the age of 18 years. deleted text begin (c) deleted text end new text begin (e) "Firearm storage unit" means a secure, tamper-resistant container that is only accessible to the owner or authorized users of the firearm or firearms stored in the container. new text end new text begin (f) "Gun room" means an area within a building enclosed by walls, a floor, and a ceiling, including a closet, that has all entrances secured by a tamper-resistant lock, that is kept locked at all times when unoccupied, and that is used exclusively for: (1) the storage of firearms, ammunition, components of firearms or ammunition, or equipment for firearm-related activities including but not limited to reloading ammunition, gunsmithing, and firearm cleaning and maintenance; or (2) conducting firearm-related activities, including but not limited to reloading ammunition, gunsmithing, and firearm cleaning and maintenance. new text end new text begin (g)new text end "Loaded" means the firearm has ammunition in the chamber or magazine, if the magazine is in the firearmdeleted text begin , unless the firearm is incapable of being fired by a child who is likely to gain access to the firearmdeleted text end . new text begin (h) "Locking device" means a feature of a firearm or an external device that renders the firearm inaccessible or inoperable, or both, to children and unauthorized users. Locking device includes but is not limited to the following: a biometric lock; a trigger lock; a barrel lock; or a cylinder lock. new text end Subd. 2. Access to firearms. A person deleted text begin is guilty of a gross misdemeanor who negligently stores or leaves a loaded firearm in a location where the person knows, or reasonably should know, that a child is likely to gain access, unless reasonable action is taken to secure the firearm against access by the childdeleted text end new text begin may not store, keep, or leave a firearm in any place unless the firearm is: (1) unloaded and equipped with a locking device; or (2) loaded or unloaded in a locked firearm storage unit or a locked gun room. A firearm is not considered stored, kept, or left under this subdivision during the period that it is under the direct physical control or reach of the person. A person who violates this subdivision is guilty of an offense and may be sentenced as provided in subdivision 2anew text end . new text begin Subd. 2a. new text end new text begin Penalties. new text end new text begin (a) A person who violates subdivision 2 is guilty of a petty misdemeanor. new text end new text begin (b) A person who violates subdivision 2 is guilty of a gross misdemeanor if a child is present in the area where the firearm is stored, kept, or left. new text end new text begin (c) A person who violates subdivision 2 is guilty of a felony and may be sentenced to three years in prison or a fine of up to $5,000, or both, if a loaded unsecured firearm is accessed by a child or a person prohibited from possessing firearms under section 624.713, subdivision 1. new text end new text begin (d) A person who violates subdivision 2 is guilty of a felony and may be sentenced to five years in prison or a fine of up to $10,000, or both, if an unsecured firearm is used in a felony crime of violence or to inflict substantial or great bodily harm on, or to cause the death of, someone other than the owner or authorized user of the firearm. new text end Subd. 3. Limitations. deleted text begin Subdivisiondeleted text end new text begin Subdivisionsnew text end 2 deleted text begin doesdeleted text end new text begin and 2a donew text end not apply to deleted text begin a child's access todeleted text end firearms deleted text begin that was obtained as a result of an unlawful entry.deleted text end new text begin :new text end new text begin (1) in a motor vehicle while being transported in compliance with the requirements of section 97B.045, subdivision 1, clause (1), (2), or (3); new text end new text begin (2) in a motor vehicle while being transported under the exceptions described in section 97B.045, subdivision 2 or 3; new text end new text begin (3) being used at a shooting sport event controlled by the Minnesota State High School League, including but not limited to the Minnesota State High School Clay Target League; new text end new text begin (4) being used for sports shooting at an area or facility designated or operated primarily for the use of firearms or shooting preserves as described in section 97A.115; new text end new text begin (5) being used at a lawfully organized educational or instructional course on firearm safety or the safe use of firearms pursuant to section 97B.015 or 624.714, subdivision 2a; new text end new text begin (6) being used for hunting in compliance with the requirements of chapter 97B; new text end new text begin (7) owned or possessed by a peace officer as defined in section 626.84, subdivision 1, paragraph (c), while the officer is engaged in the performance of official duties; or new text end new text begin (8) stored in a police or sheriff station. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $10,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of corrections for costs associated with this act. The base for this appropriation is $19,000 beginning in fiscal year 2028. new text end